src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/N-I-matsikini_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - matsikini - ok : # -m inanimate noun, shoe AEW NA1
     atsikini+NI+Sg: atsikini
     atsikini+NI+Pl: atsikiistsi
     atsikini+NI+Non: atsikii

     atsikini+NI+Px1Sg+Sg: [ natsikini, natsikiimi ]
     atsikini+NI+Px1Sg+Pl: [ natsikiistsi, natsikiimistsi ]
     atsikini+NI+Px1Sg+Non: [ natsikii, natsikiimi ]

     atsikini+NI+Px1Pl+Sg: [ natsikinnaani, natsikiiminnaani ]
     atsikini+NI+Px1Pl+Pl: [ natsikinnaanistsi, natsikiiminnaanistsi ]
     atsikini+NI+Px1Pl+Non: [ natsikinnaani, natsikiiminnaani ]

     atsikini+NI+Px21Pl+Sg: [ katsikinnooni, katsikiiminnooni ]
     atsikini+NI+Px21Pl+Pl: [ katsikinnoonistsi, katsikiiminnoonistsi ]
     atsikini+NI+Px21Pl+Non: [ katsikinnooni, katsikiiminnooni ]

     atsikini+NI+Px2Sg+Sg: [ katsikini, katsikiimi ]
     atsikini+NI+Px2Sg+Pl: [ katsikiistsi, katsikiimistsi ]
     atsikini+NI+Px2Sg+Non: [ katsikii, katsikiimi ]

     atsikini+NI+Px2Pl+Sg: [ katsikiwaawayi, katsikiimoaawayi ]
     atsikini+NI+Px2Pl+Pl: [ katsikiwaawaistsi, katsikiimoaawaistsi ]
     atsikini+NI+Px2Pl+Non: [ katsikiwaawai, katsikiimoaawai ]

     atsikini+NI+Px3Sg+Sg: [ matsikini, matsikiimi ]
     atsikini+NI+Px3Sg+Pl: [ matsikiistsi, matsikiimistsi ]
     atsikini+NI+Px3Sg+Non: [ matsikii, matsikiimi ]

     atsikini+NI+Px3Pl+Sg: [ matsikiwaawayi, matsikiimoaawayi ]
     atsikini+NI+Px3Pl+Pl: [ matsikiwaawaistsi, matsikiimoaawaistsi ]
     atsikini+NI+Px3Pl+Non: [ matsikiwaawai, matsikiimoaawai ]
     
     PS/i'nak+atsikini+NI+Sg: i'nakitsikini
